Utah statutes.
70A-2-323.   Form of bill of lading required in overseas shipment --
"Overseas."
(1)  Where the contract contemplates overseas shipment and contains a term
C.I.F. or C.&F. or F.O.B. vessel, the seller unless otherwise agreed must
obtain a negotiable bill of lading stating that the goods have been loaded on
board or, in the case of a term C.I.F. or C.&F., received for shipment.
(2)  Where in a case within Subsection (1) a tangible bill of lading has been
issued in a set of parts, unless otherwise agreed, if the documents are not to
be sent from abroad, the buyer may demand tender of the full set; otherwise
only one part of the bill of lading need be tendered. Even if the agreement
expressly requires a full set:
(a)  due tender of a single part is acceptable within the provisions of this
chapter on cure of improper delivery (Subsection (1) of Section 70A-2-508);
and
(b)  even though the full set is demanded, if the documents are sent from
abroad the person tendering an incomplete set may nevertheless require payment
upon furnishing an indemnity which the buyer in good faith considers adequate.
(3)  A shipment by water or by air or a contract contemplating such shipment
is "overseas" in so far as by usage of trade or agreement it is subject to the
commercial, financing or shipping practices characteristic of international
deep water commerce.
